Vermont, session 2025-2026, H414.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 33 V.S.A. chapter 74 is added to read:
CHAPTER 74. VERMONT COMMISSION ON AGING
§ 7401. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Commission” means the Vermont Commission on Aging.
(2) “Director” means the Director of Aging.
§ 7402. VERMONT COMMISSION ON AGING; ESTABLISHED
There is established the Vermont Commission on Aging within the
Department of Disabilities, Aging, and Independent Living for the purposes of:
VT LEG #380027 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.414
2025 Page 2 of 7
(1) advancing and monitoring public policy impacting Vermonters who
are aging, including Age Strong Vermont’s Multisector Plan on Aging and
Vermont’s State Plan on Aging and other policies or plans that may impact
Vermonters who are aging;
(2) educating the public and public officials about policies and programs
impacting Vermonters who are aging;
(3) advancing a culture of healthy, active, and engaged aging through
education and outreach; and
(4) building connections and collaborations across sectors to advance
the interests of Vermonters who are aging.
§ 7403. MEMBERSHIP
(a) The Commission shall be composed of the following members:
(1) one representative serving on the House Committee on Human
Services, appointed by the Speaker of the House;
(2) one senator serving on the Senate Committee on Health and Welfare,
appointed by the Committee on Committees;
(3) the Commissioner of Disabilities, Aging, and Independent Living or
designee;
(4) the Commissioner of Health or designee;
(5) the Commissioner of Labor or designee;
(6) the Commissioner of Public Safety or designee;
VT LEG #380027 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.414
2025 Page 3 of 7
(7) the Commissioner of Housing and Community Development;
(8) the Secretary of Transportation or designee;
(9) the Attorney General or designee;
(10) the Long-Term Care Ombudsman or designee;
(11) five members of the public who provide direct services to
Vermont’s population of aging adults from diverse sectors, including a
representative of the business community, health care sector, municipal
government, advocacy organizations, and family caregivers, three of whom
shall be appointed by the Speaker of the House and two of whom shall be
appointed by the Committee on Committees; and
(12) five members who identify as Vermonters who are aging, from
diverse backgrounds, including individuals who are Black, Indigenous, and
Persons of Color, as well as with regard to socioeconomic status, geographic
location, gender, sexual identity, and disability status, three of whom shall be
appointed by the Committee on Committees and two of whom shall be
appointed by the Speaker of the House.
(b) Members of the Commission shall serve three-year staggered terms.
§ 7404. MEETINGS
(a) The first meeting of each year shall be called by the representative of
the House Committee on Human Services.
VT LEG #380027 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.414
2025 Page 4 of 7
(b) Annually, the Commission shall select a chair and vice chair from
among its members.
(c) A majority of the membership shall constitute a quorum.
§ 7405. DUTIES
The duties of the Commission shall include:
(1) reviewing and recommending proposals for rules, legislation,
waivers, operations, and other policies and programs impacting Vermonters
who are aging;
(2) reviewing and providing input on State planning efforts across
agencies, including the Age Strong Vermont’s Multisector Plan on Aging and
Vermont’s State Plan on Aging and other relevant plans;
(3) encouraging the development of coordinated goals and objectives
across State government and coordinating programs, services, and facilities
among State departments, agencies, and offices, and nongovernment
organizations with regard to Vermonters who are aging;
(4) identifying and recommending ways in which the State can support
local and community efforts to promote aging well;
(5) identifying and recommending ways in which the State can partner
with nongovernmental organizations to promote aging well;
(6) promoting the skills, talents, and community contributions of
Vermonters who are aging;
VT LEG #380027 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.414
2025 Page 5 of 7
(7) assisting in the implementation of the Age Strong Vermont’s
Multisector Plan on Aging and Vermont’s State Plan on Aging;
(8) assessing challenges for Vermonters who are aging;
(9) advocating solutions to provide better integration of Vermonters who
are aging into the social and economic systems of the State;
(10) soliciting the cooperation and help of groups concerned with the
well-being of Vermonters who are aging;
(11) requesting that State agencies, departments, and offices provide
information, statistics, and recommendations to the Commission, subject to
available resources; and
(12) accepting and soliciting funds, including any gifts, donations,
grants, or bequests or any federal funds, for any Commission-related purposes.
§ 7406. DIRECTOR OF AGING
(a) Support for the work of the Commission shall be provided by the
Director of Aging, an individual who shall be qualified by reason of education,
expertise, and experience and who may have a professional degree in law,
social work, public health, or a related field. The Director shall serve on a full-
time basis and shall be exempt from classified service.
(b) The Commission shall recommend three qualified applicants for the
position of Director of Aging to the Governor for consideration. Subject to
confirmation by the Senate, the Governor shall appoint a Director within
VT LEG #380027 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.414
2025 Page 6 of 7
45 days from among those applicants recommended by the Commission for a
term of four years. The appointment for Director shall be made without regard
to political affiliation and on the basis of integrity and demonstrated ability.
The Director shall hold office until reappointed or until a successor is
appointed.
(c) The Governor, upon a majority vote of the Commission, may remove
the Director for cause, which includes only neglect of duty, gross misconduct,
conviction of a crime, or inability to perform the Director’s responsibilities.
The Speaker of the House and President Pro Tempore shall simultaneously
receive notification from the Governor of the Director’s removal. Any
vacancy shall be filled by the appointment process set forth in subsection (b) of
this section for the remainder of the unexpired term.
(d) The Director shall appoint an Associate Director, whose duties shall be
performed at the direction of the Director.
(e) Upon any vacancy in the position of the Director, and until such time as
a replacement is appointed and confirmed, the Associate Director shall serve as
the acting Director. The acting Director shall have the full responsibilities of
the Director and shall be entitled to the same compensation as the outgoing
Director.
VT LEG #380027 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.414
2025 Page 7 of 7
§ 7407. DATA COLLECTION AND REPORTING
Notwithstanding 2 V.S.A. § 20(d), the Director of Aging established
pursuant to section 7406 of this chapter shall submit to the General Assembly
and the Governor on or before December 1 of each year a report describing the
work and recommendations of the Commission, including:
(1) findings related to services for and assistance to Vermonters who are
aging;
(2) recommendations related to improving services for Vermonters who
are aging and their families; and
(3) data disaggregated by race, ethnicity, gender, geographic location,
disability status, and any other categories that the Commission deems
necessary.
Sec. 2. VERMONT COMMISSION ON AGING; APPROPRIATION
In fiscal year 2026, $155,000.00 is appropriated to the Vermont
Commission on Aging for the purpose of hiring a Director of Aging and
Associate Director pursuant to 33 V.S.A. chapter 74, whose term shall begin
on January 1, 2026.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380027 v.2